Utah statutes.
58-24b-502.   Unprofessional conduct.
In addition to the conduct described in Subsection 58-1-501(2),
"unprofessional conduct" includes:
(1)  using or employing the services of an individual to assist a person
licensed under this chapter in a manner that is not in accordance with:
(a)  generally recognized practices, standards, or ethics of the profession
for which the person is licensed; or
(b)  the requirements of this chapter or rule;
(2)  failure by a person licensed under this chapter to confine the person's
conduct to that which:
(a)  the person is competent to perform, by education, training, and
experience; and
(b)  is within the scope of practice permitted under this chapter or rule;
(3)  failure to supervise a licensed physical therapist assistant or a
physical therapy aide in accordance with the requirements of this chapter or
rule; and
(4)  other conduct defined as "unprofessional conduct" by the division, by
rule.
